Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 23.5
CONTROLLED ATMOSPHERE STORAGE OF APPLES

Section

35-23.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Controlled Atmosphere Storage of Apples Act".

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1599, § 1, effective May 24.

35-23.5-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Controlled atmosphere storage" means the storage of apples under conditions which comply with the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1599, § 1, effective May 24.

35-23.5-103. Voluntary inspection of facility - rules - fee.

The commissioner may inspect a controlled atmosphere storage facility upon request by the operator or under conditions set forth in rules adopted by the commissioner pursuant to sections 24-4-103, C.R.S., and 35-23.5-104. The commissioner may fix, assess, and collect fees in amounts that cover actual costs associated with inspection and the issuance of certificates of inspection.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1599, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 705, § 23, effective May 23.

35-23.5-104. Commissioner to develop rules.

The commissioner shall develop reasonable rules concerning the voluntary inspection of apples stored pursuant to this article and the controlled atmosphere storage of apples, including, among other factors, the following: Storage facility regulations; record keeping and reports; length of storage time, including the maximum time allowed to reach prescribed atmospheric conditions of temperature, oxygen, and carbon dioxide; quality regulations; and labeling and marketing.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1600, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 705, § 24, effective May 23.

35-23.5-105. Storage in another state.

When apples have been grown and stored in another state which has laws governing controlled atmosphere storage of apples similar to the provisions in effect in this state, and the apples have been stored in compliance with those provisions, such apples may be represented as having been exposed to controlled atmosphere storage when sold in this state if the state in which they were stored permits apples which are stored in this state and in compliance with the laws of this state to be represented as having been exposed to controlled atmosphere storage when sold in that state.

When apples have been grown and stored in another state which does not have laws governing controlled atmosphere storage of apples similar to provisions in effect in this state, but the apples have been stored in facilities and under conditions comparable to that required under this article and the rules adopted pursuant thereto, they may be represented as having been exposed to controlled atmosphere storage when sold in this state.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1600, § 1, effective May 24.

35-23.5-106. Suspension or revocation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1600, § 1, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

Section

35-23.5-108

provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1995. (See L. 91, p. 690.)

35-23.5-107. Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Operate a facility for the storage of apples that is represented as being a controlled atmosphere storage facility unless it meets the standards set pursuant to rule by the commissioner under the provisions of this article;

Sell, exchange, offer for sale, advertise, label, or otherwise represent that apples have been exposed to controlled atmosphere storage, unless such apples have been stored in a facility that meets the standards set pursuant to rule by the commissioner under provisions of this article.

Repealed.

Any person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars for each such offense. Each day of violation shall be deemed a separate offense.

The commissioner may initiate an action in the proper court for injunctive relief to prevent or restrain any violation of this article or the rules adopted pursuant thereto.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 1600, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 95:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, p. 705, § 25, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Section

35-23.5-108

provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(c), effective July 1, 1995. (See L. 91, p. 690.)

35-23.5-108. Repeal - review of functions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 933, § 27, effective April 28.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 333, § 21, effective April 3.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 690, § 66, effective April 20.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 706, § 26, effective May 23.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1030, § 62, effective August 6.